District of Columbia statutes.
29A-731

Repealed

Conveyances to religious congregations; not void for want of trustees.

Repealed.

R.S., D.C., § 453
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(p), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-731.
1981 Ed., § 29-913.
1973 Ed., § 29-513.